Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-4,119
Reorganization; provisions applicable.

Any reorganization of school districts that affects a school district that is a member of a learning community, except dissolutions pursuant to section 79-470, 79-498, 79-499, or 79-598, shall only be accomplished pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 30;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 20.
July 21, 2016